Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-105.5 Standing to intervene in rate
filing and ratemaking proceedings. In any workers' compensation
insurance rate filing and ratemaking proceeding before the commissioner under
article 14, an insured who is covered by workers' compensation insurance shall
have the right to intervene and participate as a party in interest. [L 1989, c
195, §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next